Utah statutes.
53-2-505.   Agreements not affected by this part.
Nothing in this part may be construed:
(1)  to limit a county, municipality, local district, special service
district, or interlocal entity from entering into an agreement allowed by law
for public safety and related purposes; or
(2)  to affect an agreement to which a county, municipality, local district,
special service district, or interlocal entity is a party.
